Hawaii statutes.
§601-17 Use of credit and debit cards to
pay for court costs, fees, expenses, and other charges. (a) Costs, fees,
bond forfeitures, fines, expenses, and other charges that are due and owing to
the courts may be paid by use of credit cards or debit cards acceptable to the
administrative director of the courts; provided that driver's license and
vehicle registration clearances shall be paid by cash only.

(b) A service fee may be paid by the judiciary
for the use of a credit or debit card service. In the event that a credit or
debit card is used to pay any charges due and owing to the courts, the
judiciary may impose an additional convenience fee on the credit or debit card
user. The amount of such convenience fee shall not exceed the amount of the service
fee imposed on the judiciary for the subject credit or debit card transaction.
[L 1978, c 35, §1; am L 2003, c 5, §1; am L 2004, c 71, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next